apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
    <pardef n="z/el__n">
      <e>       <p><l>el</l>         <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>el</l>         <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eljo</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>elema</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eleh</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>elema</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>elem</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eli</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eleh</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>elmi</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="groz/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="gosp/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ema</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eh</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ema</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eh</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emi</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="final/e__n">
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oma</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oma</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="stran__n">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jo</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ema</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eh</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ema</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eh</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="groza">           <i>groz</i><par n="groz/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="finale">          <i>final</i><par n="final/e__n"/></e>
	<e lm="dlan">            <i>dlan</i><par n="stran__n"/></e>
	<e lm="stran">           <i>stran</i><par n="stran__n"/></e>
